Washington statutes.
RCW 19.105.571

Spouses of military personnel—Registration.

The director shall develop rules consistent with RCW 18.340.020 for the registration of spouses of military personnel.

[ 2011 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 5.]

NOTES:

Implementation—2011 2nd sp.s. c 5: See note following RCW 18.340.010.